Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 34.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1223
Hearing officer;
subpoena power; enforcement.

The hearing officer
shall have the power by subpoena to compel the appearance of witnesses and
the production of any relevant evidence. Any witness compelled to attend or
produce evidence shall be entitled to the fees and expenses allowed in district
court. Any failure to respond to such subpoena shall be certified by the director to the district court
of Lancaster County for enforcement or for punishment for contempt of the
district court.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 23;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 34.